Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.38.128 and 2007 c 440 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To promote the stability of Washington's cardiac care delivery system, ((by July 1, 2008, the department of health shall adopt))the department of health shall:(a) Adopt rules establishing criteria for the issuance of a certificate of need under this chapter for the performance of elective percutaneous coronary interventions at hospitals that do not otherwise provide on-site cardiac surgery; and(b) By July 1, 2027, adopt rules establishing criteria for the issuance of a certificate of need under this chapter for the performance of elective percutaneous coronary interventions at ambulatory surgical facilities.(2) Prior to initiating rule making under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall contract for an independent evidence-based review of the circumstances under which elective percutaneous coronary interventions should be allowed in Washington at hospitals that do not otherwise provide on-site cardiac surgery. The review shall address, at a minimum, factors related to access to care, patient safety, quality outcomes, costs, and the stability of Washington's cardiac care delivery system and of existing cardiac care providers, and ensure that elective coronary intervention volumes at the University of Washington academic medical center are maintained at levels required for training of cardiologists consistent with applicable accreditation requirements. The department shall consider the results of this review, and any associated recommendations, in adopting these rules.--- END ---